District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-301.53

Involuntary dissolution.

Repealed.

Aug. 6, 1962, 76 Stat. 286, Pub. L. 87-569, § 53
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-268, § 2(b), 54 DCR 833
June 12, 2007, D.C. Law 17-4, § 3(b), 54 DCR 4085
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 214, 56 DCR 1117
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-301.53.
1981 Ed., § 29-554.
1973 Ed., § 29-1053.